Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 2. Licenses

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 2.

§ 28.2-702.
Licenses to take crabs; shedding operations; amount of fee.

Any person desiring to take or catch crabs for market or profit from the waters of this Commonwealth, or waters under its jurisdiction, or any person desiring to engage in the business of buying or marketing crabs for packing or canning crabs, shall pay to any officer the following fees or as such fees may be subsequently revised by the Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

:

For each person taking or catching crabs by dip nets, $8;

For ordinary trotlines, $8;

For patent trotlines, $31;

For up to 100 crab pots, $29;

For over 100 but not more than 300 crab pots, $48;

For over 300 but not more than 500 crab pots, $100;

For over 500 crab pots, $250;

For each boat used for taking or catching hard crabs with dredges, $58;

For each crab trap or crab pound, $5;

For each single-rigged crab-scrape boat, $16;

For each double-rigged crab-scrape boat, $32;

For up to 20 tanks and floats for shedding crabs, $7.50;

For more than 20 tanks or floats for shedding crabs, $15; and

For taking or catching peeler crabs using peeler pots, $29.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-170; 1954, c. 368; 1956, c. 293; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-165; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1968, c. 785; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1983, cc. 307, 603; 1985, c. 180; 1990, c. 154; 1992, c. 836; 1993, c. 11; 2009, c. 9.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 9 added “or as such fees may be subsequently revised by the Commission pursuant to §

28.2-201

” at the end of the introductory language.

§ 28.2-703.
License for certain assistants not required.

During June through August, any person fifteen years of age or under may be an assistant to a boat operator catching blue crabs by crab pots without obtaining a license.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-170; 1954, c. 368; 1956, c. 293; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-165; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1968, c. 785; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1983, cc. 307, 603; 1985, c. 180; 1990, c. 154; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-704.
Sale of crabbing licenses.

The Commission may require the purchase of licenses before each crab season begins.
It may set time periods for the sale of licenses for taking crabs in order to determine the appropriateness of instituting seasonal conservation measures and may grant extensions to individual applicants when it finds exceptional circumstances exist.

History.

1985, c. 165, § 28.1-172.1; 1992, c. 836.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 2.